src/morphology/inflection/adverbs.lexc
!! !!!Adverb inflection
!! Most adverbs are morphologically either sti-derivations of adjectives or
!! some specific form of an existing or archaic noun, and they have limited
!! inflection in form of possessives and clitics carried over. According to
!! modern dictionaries different forms of same root are separate adverbs,
!! so they are not inflected here, but listed in roots.


LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS


+PxSg1:%>ni  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS

+PxSg1:%>ni  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_AN

+PxSg3:%>an    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>an    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_EN

+PxSg3:%>en    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN

+PxSg3:%>en    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN

+PxSg3:%>än    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_CLIT


+Foc/han:%>han   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hankaan  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hanko #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hanpa #        ;
+Qst:%>ko #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>kohan #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kokaan    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kokin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kopa   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kos    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pa #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pahan #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pakaan    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pakin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pako   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pas    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kinhan  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kinkaan #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kinko    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kinpa    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaanhan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaankin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaanko    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaanpa    #        ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_CLIT

+Foc/han:%>hän   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hänkään  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hänkö #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hänpä #        ;
+Qst:%>kö #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>köhän #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kökään    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kökin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>köpä   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kös    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pä #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pähän #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>päkään    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>päkin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>päkö   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>päs    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kinhän  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kinkään #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kinkö    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kinpä    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kään  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>käänhän  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>käänkin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>käänkö    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>käänpä    #        ;




LEXICON ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ADV_BACK_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ADV_FRONT_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT
0    ADV_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ADV_BACK_POSS_AN ;
0    ADV_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
0    ADV_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ADV_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ADV_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    ADV_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN  ;
0    ADV_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;






LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_OPT
0    ADV_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADV_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL
0   ADV_BACK_POSS  ;
0   ADV_BACK_POSS_AN   ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
0   ADV_BACK_POSS  ;
0   ADV_BACK_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   ADV_FRONT_POSS_ÄN   ;

LEXICON ADV_BACK_POSS_OPT
0   ADV_BACK_POSS   ;
0   ADV_BACK_CLIT   ;
0   #   ;
